cs: Džínovina sepraná: Plísňové praní; Černé praní; Barevné praní; Tmavé praní; Světlé praní; Střední praní; Surový/nepraný; Opraný vzhled; Vintage praní; Bílé/bělené praní; Jiné
ko: 데님 워싱: 애시드 워시; 블랙 워시; 컬러 워시; 다크 워시; 라이트 워시; 미디엄 워시; 로/언워시드; 스톤 워시; 빈티지 워시; 화이트/블리치 워시; 기타
sl-SI: Pranje denima: Kislinsko pranje; Črno pranje; Barvno pranje; Temno pranje; Svetlo pranje; Srednje pranje; Surovo/neprano; Pranje s kamni; Vintage pranje; Belo/beljeno pranje; Drugo
sv: Denimtvätt: Syratvätt; Svart tvätt; Färgad tvätt; Mörk tvätt; Ljus tvätt; Medium tvätt; Rå/otvättad; Stentvätt; Vintagetvätt; Vit/blekt tvätt; Övrigt
pt-PT: Lavagem de jeans: Lavagem ácida; Lavagem preta; Lavagem colorida; Lavagem escura; Lavagem clara; Lavagem média; Cru/não lavado; Lavagem com pedras; Lavagem vintage; Lavagem branca/com lixívia; Outro
it: Lavaggio denim: Acid wash; Lavaggio nero; Lavaggio colorato; Lavaggio scuro; Lavaggio chiaro; Lavaggio medio; Grezzo/non lavato; Stone wash; Lavaggio vintage; Lavaggio bianco/decolorato; Altro
ru: Стирка джинсовой ткани: Кислотная стирка; Черная стирка; Цветная стирка; Темная стирка; Светлая стирка; Средняя стирка; Сырой/без стирки; Стоунвош; Винтажная стирка; Белая/отбеленная; Другое
th: ประเภทการฟอกผ้ายีนส์: ฟอกด้วยกรด (กัดสี); ฟอกดำ; ฟอกสี; ฟอกเข้ม; ฟอกอ่อน; ฟอกระดับกลาง; ผ้าดิบ/ไม่ฟอก; ฟอกหิน; ฟอกสไตล์วินเทจ; ฟอกขาว/ฟอกสี; อื่นๆ
fi: Denimpesu: Happopesu; Musta pesu; Värillinen pesu; Tumma pesu; Vaalea pesu; Keskivaalea pesu; Raaka/pesemätön; Kivipesu; Vintage-pesu; Valkoinen/valkaistu pesu; Muu
ja: デニムウォッシュ: アシッドウォッシュ; ブラックウォッシュ; カラーウォッシュ; ダークウォッシュ; ライトウォッシュ; ミディアムウォッシュ; 生/未洗い; ストーンウォッシュ; ヴィンテージウォッシュ; ホワイト/ブリーチウォッシュ; その他
vi: Kiểu giặt vải denim: Giặt axit; Giặt đen; Giặt màu; Giặt màu đậm; Giặt màu nhạt; Giặt màu trung bình; Thô/chưa giặt; Giặt đá; Giặt kiểu cổ điển; Giặt trắng/tẩy; Khác
lt-LT: Džinso plovimo tipas: Balinta rūgštimi; Juodas plovimas; Spalvotas plovimas; Tamsus plovimas; Šviesus plovimas; Vidutinis plovimas; Neapdorotas / neskalbtas; Balinta akmenimis; Vintažinis atspalvis; Baltas / balintas; Kita
zh-CN: 牛仔布水洗工艺: 酸洗; 黑洗; 彩洗; 深色水洗; 浅色水洗; 中度水洗; 原色/未洗; 石洗; 复古水洗; 漂白水洗; 其他
hr-HR: Pranje trapera: Izbijeljeno kiselinom (acid wash); Crno isprano; Isprano u boji; Tamno isprano; Svijetlo isprano; Srednje isprano; Sirovo / neisprano; Kameno isprano (stone wash); Vintage isprano; Bijelo / isprano izbjeljivačem; Ostalo
es: Lavado del vaquero: Lavado al ácido; Lavado negro; Lavado de color; Lavado oscuro; Lavado claro; Lavado medio; Crudo/sin lavar; Lavado a la piedra; Lavado vintage; Lavado blanco/blanqueado; Otro
ro-RO: Spălare denim: Spălare cu acid; Spălare neagră; Spălare colorată; Spălare închisă; Spălare deschisă; Spălare medie; Brut/nespălat; Spălare cu pietre (stone wash); Spălare vintage; Spălare albă/decolorată; Altele
de: Denim-Waschung: Acid-Wash; Schwarz gewaschen; Farbig gewaschen; Dunkel gewaschen; Hell gewaschen; Mittel gewaschen; Roh/ungewaschen; Stone-Wash; Vintage-Wash; Weiß/gebleicht; Sonstige
hu: Farmermosás: Savmosott; Fekete mosott; Színes mosott; Sötét mosott; Világos mosott; Közepes mosott; Nyers/mosatlan; Kőmosott; Vintage mosott; Fehér/hipózott; Egyéb
pt-BR: Lavagem do jeans/denim: Lavagem ácida; Lavagem preta; Lavagem colorida; Lavagem escura; Lavagem clara; Lavagem média; Cru/sem lavagem; Stone wash; Lavagem vintage; Lavagem branca/alvejada; Outra
nb: Denimvask: Syrevask; Svart vask; Farget vask; Mørk vask; Lys vask; Middels vask; Rå/uvasket; Steinvask; Vintage vask; Hvit/bleket vask; Annet
el: Ξέπλυμα τζιν: Ξεβαμμένο (Acid wash); Μαύρο πλύσιμο; Χρωματιστό πλύσιμο; Σκούρο πλύσιμο; Ανοιχτόχρωμο πλύσιμο; Μεσαίο πλύσιμο; Ακατέργαστο/άπλυτο; Πετροπλυσμένο; Vintage πλύσιμο; Λευκό/ξεβαμμένο πλύσιμο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Pranie denimu: Acid wash; Čierne pranie; Farebné pranie; Tmavé pranie; Svetlé pranie; Stredné pranie; Surové/neprané; Stone wash; Vintage wash; Biele/bielené; Iné
tr: Denim yıkama türü: Asit yıkama; Siyah yıkama; Renkli yıkama; Koyu yıkama; Açık yıkama; Orta yıkama; Ham/yıkanmamış; Taş yıkama; Vintage yıkama; Beyaz/ağartıcı yıkama; Diğer
nl: Denim wassing: Acid wash; Zwarte wassing; Gekleurde wassing; Donkere wassing; Lichte wassing; Medium wassing; Rauw/ongewassen; Stonewash; Vintage wassing; Witte/gebleekte wassing; Overige
bg-BG: Обработка на денима: Избелен (acid wash); Черно изпиране; Цветно изпиране; Тъмно изпиране; Светло изпиране; Средно изпиране; Суров/непран; Изпиране с камъни (stone wash); Винтидж изпиране; Бяло/избелено изпиране; Друго
da: Denimvask: Syrevask; Sort vask; Farvet vask; Mørk vask; Lys vask; Medium vask; Rå/uvasket; Stenvask; Vintage-vask; Hvid/bleget vask; Andet
fr: Délavage du denim: Délavage à l'acide; Délavage noir; Délavage de couleur; Délavage foncé; Délavage clair; Délavage moyen; Brut/non délavé; Stone wash; Délavage vintage; Délavage blanc/à l'eau de Javel; Autre
pl: Spranie denimu: Acid wash; Sprany czarny; Sprany kolorowy; Sprany ciemny; Sprany jasny; Sprany średni; Surowe/niesprane; Stone wash; Vintage wash; Biały/wybielany; Inne
en: Denim wash: Acid wash; Black wash; Colored wash; Dark wash; Light wash; Medium wash; Raw/unwashed; Stone wash; Vintage wash; White/bleach wash; Other
zh-TW: 牛仔布水洗: 酸洗; 黑水洗; 彩色水洗; 深色水洗; 淺色水洗; 中色水洗; 原色/未水洗; 石洗; 復古水洗; 白色/漂白水洗; 其他